North Dakota, session 69, SB2189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 53-06.1-03 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Except as authorized by the attorney general, an organization that has its license
suspended or revoked, or has relinquished or not renewed its license and not
disbursed its net proceeds, is ineligible for a license or permit. Only one of two or more
closely related organizations may have a license or permit at one time. A college or
university fraternity, sorority, or club is not closely related to an educational
organization. An organization shall apply for a permit as follows:
a. An organization recognized as a public-spirited organization by the governing
body of a city or county may apply for permits. A local permit may allow the
organization to conduct only raffles, bingo, or sports pools. A restricted event
permit may allow the organization to conduct only raffles, bingo, sports pools,
paddlewheels, twenty-one, and poker.
b. The organization or closely related organizations as a whole may:
(1) May only award a primary prize that does not exceed eight thousand dollars
and total prizes of all games which do not exceed forty thousand dollars per
year. These maximum prize amounts do not apply to raffles conducted
under chapter 20.1-08.
Page No. 1 25.0057.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2) After conducting raffles, bingo, sports pools, paddlewheels, twenty - one, or
poker, shall provide a list including each prize and its value to the attorney
general on a form prescribed by the attorney general.
c. The determination of what is a "public-spirited organization" is within the sole
discretion of the governing body. An organization shall disclose on the application
its intended use of the net income from the gaming activity. A governing body
may issue a permit for games to be held at designated times and places.
b.d. An organization shall apply to the governing body of the city or county in which
the proposed site is located. Application must be made on a form prescribed by
the attorney general. Approval may be granted at the discretion of the governing
body. A governing body may establish a fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars for
each permit. A permit must be on a fiscal year basis from July first to June
thirtieth or on a calendar-year basis.
c.e. An organization that has a local permit or a restricted event permit may use the
net income from the gaming activity for any purpose that does not violate this
chapter or gaming rules, unless the organization is a state political party or
legislative district party committee, the organization may use the net income from
a raffle for a political purpose. For purposes of this subdivision, a public-spirited
use includes a political purpose.
d.f. An organization that has a restricted event permit is restricted to one event per
year and:
(1) May not pay remuneration to employees for personal services;
(2) Shall use chips as wagers;
(3) Shall redeem a player's chips for merchandise prizes or cash;
(4) Shall disburse net income to eligible uses referenced in subdivision c, if
applicable, and in section 53-06.1-11.1; and
(5) Shall file a report prescribed by the attorney general with the governing
body and attorney general.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 53-06.1-11.1 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Except as provided in subdivision ce of subsection 1 of section 53-06.1-03:
Page No. 2 25.0057.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. A licensed organization or an organization that has a permit may not use money
from any source for placing an initiated or referred measure on a ballot or for a
political campaign to promote or oppose a person for public office.
b. Except for a use related to an organization's primary purpose, a licensed
organization or organization that has a permit may not use net proceeds to
influence legislation or promote or oppose referendums or initiatives.
c. Any funds expended by a licensed organization or an organization that has a
permit to promote or oppose an initiated or referred measure that is on the ballot
or for any activities of a lobbyist under section 54-05.1-02, that are not
compensation or expenses paid to a lobbyist, and that are not required to be
reported under section 54-05.1-03 must be reported to the attorney general as
prescribed by the attorney general. A violation of this subsection subjects an
organization to a suspension of its license or permit for up to one year.
Page No. 3 25.0057.01000